Nevada, session 83, AB339.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 433.314 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.314 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Establish policies to ensure adequate development and
administration of services for persons with mental illness, persons
with intellectual disabilities, persons with developmental
disabilities, persons with substance use disorders or persons with co-
occurring disorders, including services to prevent mental illness,
intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, substance use
disorders and co-occurring disorders, and services provided without
admission to a facility or institution;
(b) Set policies for the care and treatment of persons with mental
illness, persons with intellectual disabilities, persons with
developmental disabilities, persons with substance use disorders or
persons with co-occurring disorders provided by all state agencies;
(c) If a data dashboard is established pursuant to NRS 439.245,
use the data dashboard to review access by different groups and
populations in this State to behavioral health services provided
through telehealth, as defined in NRS 629.515, and evaluate policies
to make such access more equitable;
(d) Review the programs and finances of the Division;
(e) Report at the beginning of each year to the Governor and at
the beginning of each odd-numbered year to the Legislature:
(1) Information concerning the quality of the care and
treatment provided for persons with mental illness, persons with
intellectual disabilities, persons with developmental disabilities,
persons with substance use disorders or persons with co-occurring
disorders in this State and on any progress made toward improving
the quality of that care and treatment; and
(2) In coordination with the Department, any
recommendations from the regional behavioral health policy boards
created pursuant to NRS 433.429. The report must include, without
limitation:
(I) The epidemiologic profiles of substance use disorders,
addictive disorders related to gambling and suicide;
(II) Relevant behavioral health prevalence data for each
behavioral health region created by NRS 433.428; and
(III) The health priorities set for each behavioral health
region; [and]
-
*AB339_R1*

– 4 –
(f) Review and make recommendations concerning regulations
submitted to the Commission for review pursuant to NRS 641.100,
641A.160, 641B.160 and 641C.200 [.] ;
(g) Coordinate with the Office of Children’s Mental and
Behavioral Health created by section 5 of this act regarding the
mental and behavioral health of children in this State; and
(h) Review the statewide plan for the provision of mental and
behavioral health services to children developed by the Office of
Children’s Mental and Behavioral Health pursuant to section 6 of
this act and integrate the policies and procedures set forth in the
statewide plan into the policies established by the Commission
where appropriate.
2. The Commission may employ an administrative assistant
and a data analyst to assist the regional behavioral health policy
boards created by NRS 433.429 in carrying out their duties.
Sec. 2. NRS 433.4295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.4295 1. Each policy board shall:
(a) Advise the Department, Division and Commission regarding:
(1) The behavioral health needs of adults and children in the
behavioral health region;
(2) Any progress, problems or proposed plans relating to the
provision of behavioral health services and methods to improve the
provision of behavioral health services in the behavioral health
region;
(3) Identified gaps in the behavioral health services which
are available in the behavioral health region and any
recommendations or service enhancements to address those gaps;
(4) Any federal, state or local law or regulation that relates to
behavioral health which it determines is redundant, conflicts with
other laws or is obsolete and any recommendation to address any
such redundant, conflicting or obsolete law or regulation; and
(5) Priorities for allocating money to support and develop
behavioral health services in the behavioral health region.
(b) Promote improvements in the delivery of behavioral health
services in the behavioral health region.
(c) Coordinate and exchange information with [the] :
(1) The other policy boards to provide unified and
coordinated recommendations to the Department, Division and
Commission regarding behavioral health services in the behavioral
health region [.] ; and
(2) The Office of Children’s Mental and Behavioral Health
created by section 5 of this act to provide unified and coordinated
recommendations to the Department, Division and Commission
regarding the behavioral health needs of children in the
behavioral health region.
-
*AB339_R1*

– 5 –
(d) Review the collection and reporting standards of behavioral
health data to determine standards for such data collection and
reporting processes.
(e) To the extent feasible, establish an organized, sustainable
and accurate electronic repository of data and information
concerning behavioral health and behavioral health services in the
behavioral health region that is accessible to members of the public
on an Internet website maintained by the policy board. A policy
board may collaborate with an existing community-based
organization to establish the repository.
(f) To the extent feasible, track and compile data concerning
persons placed on a mental health crisis hold pursuant to NRS
433A.160, persons admitted to mental health facilities and hospitals
under an emergency admission pursuant to NRS 433A.162, persons
admitted to mental health facilities under an involuntary court-
ordered admission pursuant to NRS 433A.200 to 433A.330,
inclusive, and persons ordered to receive assisted outpatient
treatment pursuant to NRS 433A.335 to 433A.345, inclusive, in the
behavioral health region, including, without limitation:
(1) The outcomes of treatment provided to such persons; and
(2) Measures taken upon and after the release of such
persons to address behavioral health issues and prevent future
mental health crisis holds and admissions.
(g) If a data dashboard is established pursuant to NRS 439.245,
use the data dashboard to review access by different groups and
populations in this State to behavioral health services provided
through telehealth, as defined in NRS 629.515, and evaluate policies
to make such access more equitable.
(h) Identify and coordinate with other entities in the behavioral
health region and this State that address issues relating to behavioral
health to increase awareness of such issues and avoid duplication of
efforts.
(i) In coordination with existing entities in this State that address
issues relating to behavioral health services, submit an annual report
to the Commission which includes, without limitation:
(1) The specific behavioral health needs of the behavioral
health region;
(2) A description of the methods used by the policy board to
collect and analyze data concerning the behavioral health needs and
problems of the behavioral health region and gaps in behavioral
health services which are available in the behavioral health region,
including, without limitation, a list of all sources of such data used
by the policy board;
-
*AB339_R1*

– 6 –
(3) A description of the manner in which the policy board
has carried out the requirements of paragraphs (c) and (h) and the
results of those activities; and
(4) The data compiled pursuant to paragraph (f) and any
conclusions that the policy board has derived from such data.
2. A report described in paragraph (i) of subsection 1 may be
submitted more often than annually if the policy board determines
that a specific behavioral health issue requires an additional report
to the Commission.
Sec. 3. Chapter 433B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 4. “Office” means the Office of Children’s Mental and
Behavioral Health created by section 5 of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Office of Children’s Mental and Behavioral
Health is hereby created within the Office of the Director of the
Department.
2. The Director of the Department shall appoint a Director of
the Office who must:
(a) Be a physician or physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, a licensed nurse or a person licensed,
certified or registered pursuant to chapters 641 to 641D, inclusive,
of NRS;
(b) Have at least 5 years of experience directly providing
mental and behavioral health services to children; and
(c) Not have any conflicts of interest relating to the
performance of his or her duties as Director of the Office. For
the purposes of this paragraph, a conflict of interest exists if the
Director of the Office:
(1) Is an officer, director or employee of a facility providing
mental and behavioral health services to children;
(2) Has a financial or other personal or private interest in a
facility providing mental and behavioral health services to
children;
(3) Directly or indirectly holds any financial interest in any
company, partnership, organization or corporation that owns,
operates or controls a facility providing mental and behavioral
health services to children; or
(4) Is an officer, director or employee of a professional
organization, if holding such a position is likely to constitute or
create the appearance of a conflict of interest.
3. The Director of the Department shall give special
consideration when appointing a Director of the Office to a
potential appointee who has earned:
-
*AB339_R1*

– 7 –
(a) The degree of doctor of philosophy in a specialty that
specifically relates to the mental or behavioral health of children;
or
(b) The degree of doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathic
medicine and has completed postgraduate training in a specialty
that specifically relates to the mental or behavioral health of
children.
4. The Director of the Office serves at the pleasure of the
Director of the Department.
5. The Director of the Office shall:
(a) Ensure that the duties of the Office are carried out;
(b) Direct and supervise all of the technical and administrative
activities of the Office; and
(c) Collaborate with public and private entities involved in the
provision of mental and behavioral health services to children in
this State to coordinate the provision of such services.
6. The Director of the Office may employ such staff as the
Director of the Office deems necessary to carry out the duties of
the Office, which may include, without limitation:
(a) Data analysts;
(b) Administrative assistants;
(c) Research and grants professionals;
(d) Professionals to engage in community engagement and
outreach; and
(e) Professionals to engage in clinical implementation and
quality assurance.
Sec. 6. The Office shall:
1. Develop and publish a statewide plan for the provision of
mental and behavioral health services to children in this State;
2. Provide expertise and act as a central resource for matters
relating to the mental and behavioral health of children in this
State;
3. Disseminate information relating to programs,
opportunities and resources to improve mental and behavioral
health care for children in this State;
4. Review the long-term strategic plan, budget requests and
reports of each mental health consortium submitted pursuant to
NRS 433B.335;
5. Track, review and analyze the policies, programs, reports
or recommendations of any agency, board, commission,
subcommittee or policy board of this State to the extent that those
policies, programs, reports or recommendations relate to the
mental and behavioral health of children in this State;
6. Study and make recommendations to local, state and
federal governmental entities concerning policies that relate to
-
*AB339_R1*

– 8 –
children with mental and behavioral health needs in this State
with the goal of improving access to and the delivery of mental
and behavioral health services and resources for children in this
State;
7. Develop sustainable partnerships with community
organizations and other private sector entities which serve
children with mental and behavioral needs in this State;
8. Collaborate with other persons and entities in this State as
necessary to streamline and connect the provision of mental and
behavioral health services for children in this State; and
9. On or before January 31 of each year:
(a) Compile a report concerning the implementation of the
statewide plan for the provision of mental and behavioral health
services to children in this State developed pursuant to subsection
1; and
(b) Transmit the report compiled pursuant to paragraph (a) to:
(1) The Director of the Department; and
(2) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature; and
(II) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
Sec. 7. 1. In carrying out the duties set forth in section 6 of
this act, the Office may:
(a) Apply for any available grants and accept any available
gifts, grants and donations, and use any such gifts, grants or
donations to carry out its purposes and duties; and
(b) Seek assistance from and cooperate with any public or
private entity.
2. Each agency, board, commission, department, officer,
employee or agent of this State, or a political subdivision thereof,
shall provide the Office with such assistance as the Office may
reasonably require in discharging its duties.
Sec. 8. NRS 433B.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 433B.020 to
433B.100, inclusive, and section 4 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 9. NRS 433B.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.335 1. Each mental health consortium established
pursuant to NRS 433B.333 shall prepare and submit to the Director
of the Department and the Director of the Office a long-term
strategic plan for the provision of mental health services to children
with emotional disturbance in the jurisdiction of the consortium. A
-
*AB339_R1*

– 9 –
plan submitted pursuant to this section is valid for 10 years after the
date of submission, and each consortium shall submit a new plan
upon its expiration.
2. In preparing the long-term strategic plan pursuant to
subsection 1, each mental health consortium must be guided by the
following principles:
(a) The system of mental health services set forth in the plan
should be centered on children with emotional disturbance and their
families, with the needs and strengths of those children and their
families dictating the types and mix of services provided.
(b) The families of children with emotional disturbance,
including, without limitation, foster parents, should be active
participants in all aspects of planning, selecting and delivering
mental health services at the local level.
(c) The system of mental health services should be community-
based and flexible, with accountability and the focus of the services
at the local level.
(d) The system of mental health services should provide timely
access to a comprehensive array of cost-effective mental health
services.
(e) Children and their families who are in need of mental health
services should be identified as early as possible through screening,
assessment processes, treatment and systems of support.
(f) Comprehensive mental health services should be made
available in the least restrictive but clinically appropriate
environment.
(g) The family of a child with an emotional disturbance should
be eligible to receive mental health services from the system.
(h) Mental health services should be provided to children with
emotional disturbance in a sensitive manner that is responsive to
cultural and gender-based differences and the special needs of the
children.
3. The long-term strategic plan prepared pursuant to subsection
1 must include:
(a) An assessment of the need for mental health services in the
jurisdiction of the consortium;
(b) The long-term strategies and goals of the consortium for
providing mental health services to children with emotional
disturbance within the jurisdiction of the consortium;
(c) A description of the types of services to be offered to
children with emotional disturbance within the jurisdiction of the
consortium;
(d) Criteria for eligibility for those services;
(e) A description of the manner in which those services may be
obtained by eligible children;
-
*AB339_R1*

– 10 –
(f) The manner in which the costs for those services will be
allocated;
(g) The mechanisms to manage the money provided for those
services;
(h) Documentation of the number of children with emotional
disturbance who are not currently being provided services, the costs
to provide services to those children, the obstacles to providing
services to those children and recommendations for removing those
obstacles;
(i) Methods for obtaining additional money and services for
children with emotional disturbance from private and public entities;
and
(j) The manner in which family members of eligible children
and other persons may be involved in the treatment of the children.
4. On or before January 31 of each even-numbered year, each
mental health consortium shall submit to the Director of the
Department , the Director of the Office and the Commission:
(a) A list of the priorities of services necessary to implement the
long-term strategic plan submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and an
itemized list of the costs to provide those services;
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium.
5. In preparing the biennial budget request for the Department,
the Director of the Department shall consider the list of priorities
and any request for an allocation submitted pursuant to subsection 4
by each mental health consortium. On or before September 30 of
each even-numbered year, the Director of the Department shall
submit to each mental health consortium a report which includes a
description of:
(a) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
included in the biennial budget request for the Department;
(b) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
not included in the biennial budget request for the Department and
an explanation for the exclusion; and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium that was included in the biennial budget request for
the Department.
6. On or before January 31 of each odd-numbered year, each
consortium shall submit to the Director of the Department , the
Director of the Office and the Commission:
-
*AB339_R1*

– 11 –
(a) A report regarding the status of the long-term strategic plan
submitted pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation,
the status of the strategies, goals and services included in the plan;
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) A report of all expenditures made from an account
maintained pursuant to NRS 433B.339, if any.
7. Each mental health consortium established pursuant to
NRS 433B.333 shall collaborate with the Office as necessary to
perform the duties prescribed in this section.
Sec. 10. NRS 433B.337 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.337 1. A mental health consortium established by NRS
433B.333 may:
(a) Participate in activities within the jurisdiction of the
consortium to:
(1) Implement the provisions of the long-term strategic plan
established by the consortium pursuant to NRS 433B.335; and
(2) Improve the provision of mental health services to
children with emotional disturbance and their families, including,
without limitation, advertising the availability of mental health
services and carrying out a demonstration project relating to mental
health services.
(b) Take other action to carry out its duties set forth in this
section and NRS 433B.335 and 433B.339.
2. To the extent practicable, a mental health consortium shall
coordinate with the Department and the Office to avoid duplicating
or contradicting the efforts of the Department and the Office to
provide mental health services to children with emotional
disturbance and their families.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the
sum of $1,113,364 for the personnel and operating costs of the
Office of Children’s Mental and Behavioral Health created by
section 5 of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
*AB339_R1*

– 12 –
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the
sum of $15,000 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 to procure equipment
and office supplies for the Office of Children’s Mental and
Behavioral Health created by section 5 of this act.
2. Any balance of the sum appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the 2025-2026 Fiscal Year must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2026, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 18, 2026.
Sec. 12.3. 1. As soon as practicable after the Director of the
Office is appointed pursuant to section 5 of this act, the Director of
the Office shall begin the process of establishing a Children’s
Behavioral Health Center of Excellence within the Office. The
Director of the Office shall:
(a) On or before January 1, 2026, compile and submit to the
Director of the Department a report describing the progress made
toward establishing the Center and developing the final proposal
required to be submitted to the Director of the Department pursuant
to paragraph (c), which must include, without limitation:
(1) A review of the capacity and readiness of the Office to
implement the Center; and
(2) A proposal to provide training, technical assistance and
quality assurance for providers of mental and behavioral health care
to children through the Center;
(b) On or before April 1, 2026, present at a meeting of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human Services
concerning the progress of the Director of the Office toward
establishing the Center; and
(c) On or before June 1, 2026, submit a final proposal to the
Director of the Department for the establishment of the Center. The
proposal must include:
(1) The manner in which the Center will be funded; and
(2) Operational plans for establishing the Center.
2. The Director of the Department shall, on or before July 1,
2026:
(a) Approve the proposal submitted by the Director of the Office
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1; or
(b) Request that the Director of the Office revise the proposal.
-
*AB339_R1*

– 13 –
3. If the Director of the Department requests that the Director
of the Office make revisions to the proposal submitted pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1, the Director of the Office shall make
the requested revisions and submit the revised proposal to the
Director of the Department on or before August 1, 2026. The
Director of the Department shall approve the revised proposal or
further revise the proposal and approve the revised proposal.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Children’s Behavioral Health Center of Excellence” means
an entity that uses the expertise and knowledge of providers of
mental and behavioral health care, community engagement
professionals, community health workers and employees of
governmental entities to:
(1) Develop and provide training to providers of mental and
behavioral health care;
(2) Provide technical and supportive services to providers of
mental and behavioral health care;
(3) Oversee the quality of the mental and behavioral health
services provided to children; and
(4) Connect children in need of mental or behavioral health
services to qualified providers of mental and behavioral health care.
(b) “Community health worker” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0027.
(c) “Director of the Department” means the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(d) “Director of the Office” means the Director of the Office.
(e) “Office” means the Office of Children’s Mental and
Behavioral Health created by section 5 of this act.
Sec. 12.7. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380
do not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 13. NRS 433.317 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 14. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 13, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
-
*AB339_R1*

– 14 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
433.317 Appointment of subcommittee on the mental health
of children; duties; compensation to extent of available funding.
1. The Commission shall appoint a subcommittee on the
mental health of children to review the findings and
recommendations of each mental health consortium submitted
pursuant to NRS 433B.335 and to create a statewide plan for the
provision of mental health services to children.
2. The members of the subcommittee appointed pursuant to
this section serve at the pleasure of the Commission. The members
serve without compensation, except that each member is entitled,
while engaged in the business of the subcommittee, to the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally if funding is available for this purpose.
H
-
*AB339_R1*